West Virginia, session 2025, HB3441.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: article 5. fiscal affairs. §7-5-22. County solid waste assessment fees authorized. Each county or regional solid waste authority is hereby authorized to impose a similar solid waste assessment fee to that imposed by §22-15-11 of this code at a rate not to exceed 50¢ $1 per ton or part thereof upon the disposal of solid waste in that county or region. All assessments due shall be applied to the reasonable costs of administration of the county's regional or county solid waste authority including the necessary and reasonable expenses of its members, and any other expenses incurred from refuse cleanup, litter control programs, or any solid waste programs deemed necessary to fulfill its duties.